California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(a) Completion of an educational program for registered dental hygienists, approved by the dental hygiene board, accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation, and conducted by a degree-granting, postsecondary institution.

(b) Within the preceding three years, a person completed either of the following:

(1) Satisfactory completion of the dental hygiene examination given by the Western Regional Examining Board or any other clinical or dental hygiene examination approved by the dental hygiene board.

(2) Graduation from a California accredited dental hygiene college approved by the dental hygiene board.

(c) Satisfactory completion of the National Board Dental Hygiene Examination.

(d) Satisfactory completion of the examination in California law and ethics as prescribed by the dental hygiene board.

(e) Submission of a completed application form and all fees required by the dental hygiene board.

(f) Satisfactory completion of dental hygiene board-approved instruction in gingival soft-tissue curettage, nitrous oxide-oxygen analgesia, and local anesthesia.

(g) Current, valid certification in basic life support offered by a course
 consistent with Section 1016, 1016.2, or 1017 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 677, Sec. 3.   (AB 1257)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.1.

(a) The dental hygiene board may grant a license as a registered dental hygienist to an applicant who has not taken a clinical examination before the dental hygiene board, if the applicant submits all of the following to the dental hygiene board:

(1) A completed application form and all fees required by the dental hygiene board.

(2) Proof of a current license as a registered dental hygienist issued by another state that is not revoked, suspended, or otherwise restricted.

(3) Proof that the applicant has been in clinical practice as a registered dental hygienist
 or has been a full-time faculty member in an accredited dental hygiene education program for a minimum of 750 hours per year for at least five years immediately preceding the date of application under this section. The clinical practice requirement shall be deemed met if the applicant provides proof of at least three years of clinical practice and commits to completing the remaining two years of clinical practice by filing with the dental hygiene board a copy of a pending contract to practice dental hygiene in any of the following facilities:

(A) A primary care clinic licensed under subdivision (a) of Section 1204 of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) A primary care clinic exempt from licensure pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 1206 of the Health and Safety Code.

(C) A clinic owned or operated by a public hospital or health system.

(D) A clinic owned and operated by a hospital that maintains the primary contract with a county government to fill the county’s role under Section 17000 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(4) Satisfactory performance on a California law and ethics examination and any examination that may be required by the dental hygiene board.

(5) Proof that the applicant has not been subject to disciplinary action by any state in which the applicant is or has been previously issued any professional or vocational license. If the applicant has been subject to disciplinary action, the dental hygiene board
 shall review that action to determine if it warrants refusal to issue a license to the applicant.

(6) Proof of graduation from a school of dental hygiene accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation.

(7) Proof of satisfactory completion of the National Board Dental Hygiene Examination and of a state clinical examination, regional clinical licensure examination, or any other clinical dental hygiene examination approved by the dental hygiene board.

(8) Proof that the applicant has not failed the state clinical examination, the examination given by the Western Regional Examining Board, or any other clinical dental hygiene examination approved by the dental hygiene board for licensure to practice dental hygiene
 under this chapter more than once or once within five years prior to the date of application for a license under this section.

(9) Documentation of completion of a minimum of 25 units of continuing education earned in the two years preceding application, including completion of any continuing education requirements imposed by the dental hygiene board on registered dental hygienists licensed in this state at the time of application.

(10) Satisfactory evidence of having successfully completed a course or education and training in local anesthesia, nitrous oxide-oxygen analgesia, and periodontal soft-tissue curettage approved by the dental hygiene board.

(11) Any other information as specified by the dental hygiene board
 to the extent that it is required of applicants for licensure by examination under this article.

(b) The dental hygiene board may periodically request verification of compliance with the requirements of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) and may revoke the license upon a finding that the employment requirement or any other requirement of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) has not been met.

(c) The dental hygiene board shall provide in the application packet to each out-of-state dental hygienist pursuant to this section the following information:

(1) The location of dental manpower shortage areas in the state.

(2) Any nonprofit clinics, public hospitals, and accredited
 dental hygiene education programs seeking to contract with licensees for dental hygiene service delivery or training purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 491, Sec. 2.   (SB 534)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.3.

Notwithstanding Section 135, an examinee for a registered dental hygienist license who either fails to pass the clinical examination required by Section 1917 after three attempts or fails to pass the clinical examination as a result of a single incidence of imposing gross trauma on a patient shall not be eligible for further reexamination until the examinee has successfully completed remedial education at an approved dental hygiene program or a comparable organization approved by the dental hygiene board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 456, Sec. 17.   (SB 786)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1918.

The dental hygiene board shall license as a registered dental hygienist in extended functions a person who meets all of the following requirements:

(a) Holds a current license as a registered dental hygienist in California.

(b) Completes clinical training approved by the dental hygiene board in a facility affiliated with a dental school under the direct supervision of the dental school faculty.

(c) Performs satisfactorily on an examination required by the dental hygiene board.

(d) Completes an application form and pays
 all application fees required by the dental hygiene board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 456, Sec. 18.   (SB 786)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1920.

(a) A person who holds a current and active license as a registered dental hygienist in extended functions or a registered dental hygienist in alternative practice on July 1, 2009, shall automatically be issued a license as a registered dental hygienist, unless the person holds a current and active registered dental hygienist license.

(b) A registered dental hygienist license issued pursuant to this section shall expire on the same date as the person’s registered dental hygienist, registered dental hygienist in alternative practice, or registered dental hygienist in extended functions license, and shall be subject to the same renewal and other requirements imposed by law or regulation on a license.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 31, Sec. 47.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Operative July 1, 2009, by Sec. 55 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

1921.

In addition to any other duties or functions authorized by law, a registered dental hygienist in extended functions or a registered dental hygienist in alternative practice may perform any of the duties or functions authorized to be performed by a registered dental hygienist.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 31, Sec. 47.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Operative July 1, 2009, by Sec. 55 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

1922.

The dental hygiene board shall license as a registered dental hygienist in alternative practice a person who demonstrates satisfactory performance on an examination in California law and ethics required by the dental hygiene board and who completes an application form and pays all application fees required by the dental hygiene board and meets either of the following requirements:

(a) Holds a current California license as a registered dental hygienist and meets the following requirements:

(1) Has been engaged in the practice of dental hygiene, as defined in Section 1908, as a registered dental hygienist in any setting, including, but not limited
 to, educational settings and public health settings, for a minimum of 2,000 hours during the immediately preceding 36 months.

(2) Has successfully completed a bachelor’s degree or its equivalent, recognized as a minimum of 120 semester credit hours or 180 quarter credit hours in postsecondary education, from a college or institution of higher education that is accredited by a national or regional accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of Education, and a minimum of 150 hours of additional educational requirements, as prescribed by the dental hygiene board by regulation, that are consistent with good dental and dental hygiene practice, including, but not necessarily limited to, dental hygiene technique and theory including gerontology and medical emergencies, and business administration and practice management.

(b) Has received a letter of acceptance into the employment utilization phase of the Health Workforce Pilot Project No. 155
 established by the Department of Health Care Access and Information pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 128125) of Chapter 3 of Part 3 of Division 107 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 511, Sec. 4.   (SB 1495)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1924.

A person licensed as a registered dental hygienist who has completed the prescribed classes through the Health Manpower Pilot Project (HMPP) and who has established an independent practice under the HMPP by June 30, 1997, shall be deemed to have satisfied the licensing requirements under Section 1922, and shall be authorized to continue to operate the practice he or she presently operates, so long as he or she follows the requirements for prescription and functions as specified in Sections 1922, 1925, 1926, 1927, 1928, 1930, and 1931, and subdivision (b) of Section 1929, and as long as he or she continues to personally practice and operate the practice or until he or she sells the practice to a licensed dentist.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 31, Sec. 47.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Operative July 1, 2009, by Sec. 55 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

1925.

A registered dental hygienist in alternative practice may practice, pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1907, subdivision (a) of Section 1908, subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 1910, Section 1910.5, and Section 1926.05 as an employee of a dentist or of another registered dental hygienist in alternative practice, as an independent contractor, as a sole proprietor of an alternative dental hygiene practice, in a primary care clinic or specialty clinic that is licensed pursuant to Section 1204 of the Health and Safety Code, in a primary care clinic exempt from licensure pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 1206 of the Health and Safety Code, in a clinic owned or operated by a public hospital or health system, in a clinic owned and operated by a hospital that
 maintains the primary contract with a county government to fill the county’s role under Section 17000 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or in a professional corporation under the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act (commencing with Section 13400) of Part 4 of Division 3 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 130, Sec. 3.   (SB 653)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1926.

In addition to practices authorized in Section 1925, a registered dental hygienist in alternative practice may perform the duties authorized pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1907, subdivision (a) of Section 1908, and subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 1910 in the following settings:

(a) Residences of the homebound.

(b) Schools.

(c) Residential facilities and other institutions and medical settings that a residential facility patient has been transferred to for outpatient services.

(d) Dental health professional
 shortage areas, as certified by the Department of Health Care Access and Information in accordance with existing office guidelines. If the dental health professional shortage area certification is removed, a registered dental hygienist in alternative practice with an existing practice in the area may continue to provide dental hygiene services, and shall annually provide patients treated at an existing practice with a list of dentists in the previous dental health professional shortage area who may be able to see the patient for comprehensive services.

(e) Dental offices.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 481, Sec. 6.   (SB 1451)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1926.01.

(a) In addition to practices authorized in Section 1925, a registered dental hygienist in alternative practice may perform the duties authorized pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 1909 with documented consultation with a collaborating dentist in the following settings:

(1) Residences of the homebound.

(2) Residential facilities and other institutions and medical settings that a residential facility patient has been transferred to for outpatient services.

(3) Dental health professional shortage areas, as certified by the Department of Health Care
 Access and Information in accordance with existing office guidelines.

(4) Dental offices.

(b) The registered dental hygienist in alternative practice shall have all of the following immediately available when services authorized in this section are being performed:

(1) One additional individual trained in basic life support qualified to administer cardiopulmonary resuscitation during an emergency.

(2) Equipment and supplies for emergency response, including oxygen.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 511, Sec. 6.   (SB 1495)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1926.05.

(a) In addition to the duties specified in Section 1926, a registered dental hygienist in alternative practice is authorized to perform the duties pursuant to Section 1910.5, in the following settings:

(1) Residences of the homebound.

(2) Schools.

(3) Residential facilities and other institutions.

(4) Dental or medical settings.

(5) Dental health professional shortage areas, as certified by the Department of Health Care Access and Information in
 accordance with existing office guidelines.

(b) A registered dental hygienist in alternative practice is authorized to perform the duties pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1910.5 in the settings specified in this section after there has been a diagnosis, treatment plan, and instruction to perform the procedure provided by a dentist.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 511, Sec. 7.   (SB 1495)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1926.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a registered dental hygienist in alternative practice may operate a mobile dental hygiene clinic in the settings listed in Section 1926.

(b) The registered dental hygienist in alternative practice shall register the mobile dental hygiene clinic with the dental hygiene board in compliance with Sections 1926.2 and 1926.3.

(c) The dental hygiene board may conduct announced and unannounced reviews and inspections of a mobile dental hygiene clinic to ensure continued compliance with the requirements for continued approval under this article.

(d) It shall constitute unprofessional conduct if the mobile dental hygiene clinic is found to be noncompliant with any requirements necessary for licensure, and the registered dental hygienist in alternative practice may be placed on probation with terms, issued a citation and fine, or have the mobile dental hygiene clinic registration withdrawn if compliance is not demonstrated within reasonable timelines, as established by the dental hygiene board.

(e) The dental hygiene board, by itself or through an authorized representative, may issue a citation containing fines and orders of abatement to the registered dental hygienist in alternative practice for any violation of this section, Section 1926.2, Section 1926.3, or any regulations adopted thereunder. Any fine collected pursuant
 to this section shall be deposited into the State Dental Hygiene Fund established pursuant to Section 1944.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 491, Sec. 3.   (SB 534)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1926.2.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a registered dental hygienist in alternative practice may operate one mobile dental hygiene clinic registered as a dental hygiene office or facility. The owner or operator of the mobile dental hygiene clinic or unit shall be registered and operated in accordance with regulations established by the dental hygiene board, which regulations shall not be designed to prevent or lessen competition in service areas, and shall pay the fees described in Section 1944.

(b) A mobile service unit, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 1765.105 of the Health and Safety Code, and a mobile unit operated by an entity that is exempt from licensure pursuant to
 subdivision (b), (c), or (h) of Section 1206 of the Health and Safety Code, are exempt from this article. Notwithstanding this exemption, the owner or operator of the mobile unit shall notify the dental hygiene board within 60 days of the date on which dental hygiene services are first delivered in the mobile unit, or the date on which the mobile unit’s application pursuant to Section 1765.130 of the Health and Safety Code is approved, whichever is earlier.

(c) A licensee practicing in a mobile unit described in subdivision (b) is not subject to subdivision (a) as to that mobile unit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 456, Sec. 21.   (SB 786)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1926.3.

(a) Every person who is now or hereafter licensed as a registered dental hygienist in alternative practice in this state shall register with the executive officer, on forms prescribed by the dental hygiene board within 30 calendar days, the physical facility of the registered dental hygienist in alternative practice or, if the registered dental hygienist in alternative practice has more than one physical facility pursuant to Section 1926.4, all of the physical facilities. If the registered dental hygienist in alternative practice does not have a physical facility, the registered dental hygienist in alternative practice shall notify the executive officer.

(b) (1) A
 registered dental hygienist in alternative practice who utilizes portable equipment to practice dental hygiene shall register with the executive officer, on forms prescribed by the dental hygiene board, the registered dental hygienist in alternative practice’s physical facility where the portable equipment is maintained.

(2) The dental hygiene board may conduct announced and unannounced reviews and inspections of a registered dental hygienist in alternative practice’s physical facilities and equipment described in paragraph (1) to ensure continued compliance with the requirements for continued approval under this article.

(c) It shall constitute unprofessional conduct if the registered dental hygienist in alternative practice’s physical facility or equipment is found to be
 noncompliant with any requirements necessary for licensure and a registered dental hygienist in alternative practice may be placed on probation with terms, issued a citation and fine, or have the owned physical facility registration withdrawn if compliance is not demonstrated within reasonable timelines, as established by the dental hygiene board.

(d) The dental hygiene board, by itself or through an authorized representative, may issue a citation containing fines and orders of abatement to the registered dental hygienist in alternative practice for any violation of this section, Section 1925, Section 1926.4, or any regulations adopted thereunder. Any fine collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the State Dental Hygiene Fund established pursuant to Section 1944.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 592, Sec. 8.   (SB 861)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1926.4.

When a registered dental hygienist in alternative practice desires to have more than one place of practice, the person shall, before opening the additional office, apply to the dental hygiene board, pay the fee required by Section 1944, and obtain permission in writing from the dental hygiene board to have the additional place of practice, subject to a biennial renewal fee described in Section 1944.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 456, Sec. 23.   (SB 786)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1927.

A registered dental hygienist in alternative practice shall not do any of the following:

(a) Infer, purport, advertise, or imply that he or she is in any way able to provide dental services or make any type of dental diagnosis beyond evaluating a patient’s dental hygiene status, providing a dental hygiene treatment plan, and providing the associated dental hygiene services.

(b) Hire a registered dental hygienist to provide direct patient services other than a registered dental hygienist in alternative practice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 350, Sec. 7.   (SB 943)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1928.

A registered dental hygienist in alternative practice may submit or allow to be submitted any insurance or third-party claims for patient services performed as authorized pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 31, Sec. 47.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Operative July 1, 2009, by Sec. 55 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

1929.

(a) A registered dental hygienist in alternative practice may hire other registered dental hygienists in alternative practice to assist in his or her practice.

(b) A registered dental hygienist in alternative practice may hire and supervise dental assistants performing intraoral retraction and suctioning.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 31, Sec. 47.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Operative July 1, 2009, by Sec. 55 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

1930.

A registered dental hygienist in alternative practice shall provide to the dental hygiene board documentation of an existing relationship with at least one dentist for referral, consultation, and emergency services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 456, Sec. 24.   (SB 786)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1931.

(a) (1) A dental hygienist in alternative practice may provide services to a patient without obtaining written verification that the patient has been examined by a dentist or physician and surgeon licensed to practice in this state.

(2) If the dental hygienist in alternative practice provides services to a patient 18 months or more after the first date that the person provides services to a patient, the person shall obtain written verification that the patient has been examined by a dentist or physician and surgeon licensed to practice in this state. The verification shall include a prescription for dental hygiene services as described in subdivision (b).

(b) A registered dental hygienist in alternative practice may provide dental hygiene services for a patient who presents to the registered dental hygienist in alternative practice a written prescription for dental hygiene services issued by a dentist or physician and surgeon licensed to practice in this state. The prescription shall be valid for a time period based on the dentist’s or physician and surgeon’s professional judgment, but not to exceed two years from the date it was issued.

(c) (1) The dental hygiene board may seek to obtain an injunction against any registered dental hygienist in alternative practice who provides services pursuant to this section, if the dental hygiene board has reasonable cause to believe that the services are being provided to
 a patient who has not received a prescription for those services from a dentist or physician and surgeon licensed to practice in this state.

(2) Providing services pursuant to this section without obtaining a prescription in accordance with subdivision (b) shall constitute unprofessional conduct on the part of the registered dental hygienist in alternative practice, and reason for the dental hygiene board to revoke or suspend the license of the registered dental hygienist in alternative practice pursuant to Section 1947.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 456, Sec. 25.   (SB 786)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1932.

(a) The dental hygiene board may, in its sole discretion, issue a probationary license to an applicant who has satisfied all requirements for licensure as a registered dental hygienist, a registered dental hygienist in alternative practice, or a registered dental hygienist in extended functions. The dental hygiene board may require, as a term or condition of issuing the probationary license, that the applicant comply with certain additional requirements, including, but not limited to, the following:

(1) Successfully completing a professional competency
 examination.

(2) Submitting to a medical or psychological evaluation.

(3) Submitting to continuing medical or psychological treatment.

(4) Abstaining from the use of alcohol or drugs.

(5) Submitting to random fluid testing for alcohol or controlled substance abuse.

(6) Submitting to continuing participation in a dental hygiene board-approved rehabilitation program.

(7) Restricting the type or circumstances of practice.

(8) Submitting to continuing education and
 coursework.

(9) Complying with requirements regarding notifying the dental hygiene board of any change of employer or employment.

(10) Complying with probation monitoring.

(11) Complying with all laws and regulations governing the practice of dental hygiene.

(12) Limiting the applicant’s practice to a supervised, structured environment in which the applicant’s activities are supervised by a specified person.

(b) The term of a probationary license is three years. During the term of the license, the licensee may petition the dental hygiene board for a modification of a term or condition of the license or for
 the issuance of a license that is not probationary.

(c) The proceedings under this section shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the dental hygiene board shall have all the powers granted in that chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 456, Sec. 26.   (SB 786)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1933.

A licensee shall be issued a substitute license upon request and payment of the required fee. The request shall be accompanied by an affidavit or declaration containing satisfactory evidence of the loss or destruction of the license certificate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 31, Sec. 47.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Operative July 1, 2009, by Sec. 55 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

1934.

A licensee who changes their physical address of record or email address shall notify the dental hygiene board within 30 days of the change. A licensee who changes their legal name shall provide the dental hygiene board with documentation of the change within 10 days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 456, Sec. 27.   (SB 786)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1935.

If not renewed, a license issued under the provisions of this article, unless specifically excepted, expires at 12 midnight on the last day of the month of the legal birth date of the licensee during the second year of a two-year term. To renew an unexpired license, the licensee shall, before the time at which the license would otherwise expire, apply for renewal on a form prescribed by the dental hygiene board and pay the renewal fee prescribed by this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 456, Sec. 28.   (SB 786)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1936.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, an expired license may be renewed at any time within five years after its expiration by filing an application for renewal on a form prescribed by the dental hygiene board and payment of all accrued renewal and delinquency fees. If the license is renewed after its expiration, the licensee, as a condition precedent of renewal, shall also pay the delinquency fee prescribed by this article. Renewal under this section shall be effective on the date on which the application is filed, on the date on which the renewal fee is paid, or on the date on which the delinquency fee, if any, is paid, whichever last occurs. If so renewed, the license shall continue in effect until the expiration date provided in Section 1935 that next
 occurs after the effective date of the renewal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 456, Sec. 29.   (SB 786)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1936.1.

(a) The dental hygiene board shall require, as a condition of license renewal, that licensees submit assurances satisfactory to the dental hygiene board that they had, during the preceding two-year period, informed themselves of the developments in the practice of dental hygiene occurring since the original issuance of their licenses by pursuing one or more courses of study satisfactory to the dental hygiene board, or by other means deemed equivalent by the dental hygiene board. The dental hygiene board shall adopt, amend, and revoke regulations providing for the suspension of the licenses at the end of the two-year period until compliance with the assurances provided for in this section is accomplished. The dental hygiene board shall conduct random audits of at least 5 percent of the licensee population each year to ensure
 compliance of the continuing education requirement.

(b) The dental hygiene board shall also, as a condition of license renewal, require licensees to successfully complete a portion of the required continuing education hours in specific areas adopted in regulations by the dental hygiene board. The dental hygiene board may prescribe this mandatory coursework within the general areas of patient care, health and safety, and law and ethics. The mandatory coursework prescribed by the dental hygiene board shall not exceed 10 hours per renewal period. Any mandatory coursework required by the dental hygiene board shall be credited toward the continuing education requirements established by the dental hygiene board pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) The providers of courses referred to in this section shall be approved by the dental hygiene board. Providers approved by the dental board shall
 be deemed approved by the dental hygiene board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 677, Sec. 4.   (AB 1257)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1937.

A suspended license is subject to expiration and shall be renewed as provided in this article. The renewal does not entitle the licensee, while the license remains suspended and until it is reinstated, to engage in the licensed activity or in any other activity or conduct in violation of the order or judgment by which the license was suspended.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 31, Sec. 47.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Operative July 1, 2009, by Sec. 55 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

1938.

A revoked license is subject to expiration as provided in this article. A revoked license may not be renewed. If it is reinstated after its expiration, the licensee, as a condition precedent to its reinstatement, shall pay a reinstatement fee in an amount equal to the renewal fee in effect on the last regular renewal date before the date on which it is reinstated and the delinquency fee, if any, accrued at the time of its revocation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 31, Sec. 47.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Operative July 1, 2009, by Sec. 55 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

1939.

A license that is not renewed within five years after its expiration may not be renewed, restored, reinstated, or reissued. The holder of the license may apply for and obtain a new license upon meeting all of the requirements of a new applicant prescribed in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 31, Sec. 47.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Operative July 1, 2009, by Sec. 55 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

1940.

(a) A licensee who desires an inactive license shall submit an application to the dental hygiene board on a form provided by the dental hygiene board.

(b) In order to restore an inactive license to active status, the licensee shall submit an application to the dental hygiene board on a form provided by the dental hygiene board, accompanied by
 evidence that the licensee has completed the required number of hours of approved continuing education in compliance with this article within the last two years preceding the date of the application.

(c) The holder of an inactive license shall continue to pay to the dental hygiene board the required biennial renewal fee.

(d) Within 30 days of receiving a request either to restore an inactive license or to inactivate a license, the dental hygiene board shall inform the applicant in writing whether the application is complete and accepted for filing or is deficient and, if so, the specific information required to complete the application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 456, Sec. 31.   (SB 786)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1941.

(a) The dental hygiene board shall grant or renew approval of only those educational programs for RDHs that continuously maintain a high-quality standard of instruction and, where appropriate, meet the minimum standards set by the Commission on Dental Accreditation of the American Dental Association or an equivalent body, as determined by the dental hygiene board.

(b) A new educational program for RDHs shall submit a feasibility study demonstrating a need for a new educational program and shall apply for approval from the dental hygiene board before seeking any required approval for initial accreditation from the Commission on Dental Accreditation of the American Dental
 Association or an equivalent body, as determined by the dental hygiene board. The dental hygiene board may approve, provisionally approve, or deny approval of a new educational program for RDHs.

(c) For purposes of this section, a new or existing educational program for RDHs means a program provided by a college or institution of higher education that is accredited by a regional accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of Education and that has as its primary purpose providing college level courses leading to an associate or higher degree, that is either affiliated with or conducted by a dental school approved by the dental board, or that is accredited to offer college level or college parallel programs by the Commission on Dental Accreditation of the American Dental Association or an equivalent body, as determined
 by the dental hygiene board.

(d) For purposes of this section, “RDHs” means registered dental hygienists, registered dental hygienists in alternative practice, or registered dental hygienists in extended functions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 491, Sec. 5.   (SB 534)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1941.5.

(a) The dental hygiene board shall renew approval of educational programs for a registered dental hygienist, a registered dental hygienist in alternative practice, or a registered dental hygienist in extended functions that certify to the dental hygiene board on a form prescribed by the dental hygiene board that the program continues to meet the requirements prescribed by the dental hygiene board.

(b) The dental hygiene board may conduct periodic surveys, evaluations, and announced and unannounced site visits to existing and new educational programs for a registered dental hygienist, a registered dental hygienist in alternative practice, or a registered dental hygienist in extended
 functions to ensure continued compliance of educational program requirements and Commission on Dental Accreditation standards for continued approval.

(c) An existing or new educational program for a registered dental hygienist, a registered dental hygienist in alternative practice, or a registered dental hygienist in extended functions that is found to be noncompliant with the educational program requirements and Commission on Dental Accreditation standards may be placed on probation with terms, issued a citation and fine, or have its approval withdrawn if compliance is not met within reasonable specified timelines.

(d) The dental hygiene board, or through an authorized representative, may issue a citation containing fines and orders of abatement for any approved educational
 program for a registered dental hygienist, a registered dental hygienist in alternative practice, or a registered dental hygienist in extended functions for any violation of this section or the regulations adopted pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 456, Sec. 33.   (SB 786)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1942.

(a) As used in this article, “extramural dental facility” means any clinical facility that has contracted with an approved dental hygiene educational program for instruction in dental hygiene, that exists outside or beyond the walls, boundaries, or precincts of the primary campus of the approved program, and in which dental hygiene services are rendered.

(b) An approved dental hygiene educational program shall register an extramural dental facility with the dental hygiene board. That registration shall be accompanied by information supplied by the dental hygiene program pertaining to faculty supervision, scope of treatment to be rendered, name and location of the facility, date